Utah statutes.
4-32-13.   Meat or poultry products to be marked or labeled -- Meat or poultry products not intended for human food -- Dead, dying, disabled, or diseased animals.

(1)  A person may not sell, transport, offer for sale or transportation, or receive for transportation, any animal carcasses or parts of such carcasses, or the meat or meat products, unless they are plainly and conspicuously marked or labeled or otherwise identified as required by rules adopted by the department to show the kinds of animals from which they were derived.

(2)  A person may not buy, sell, transport, or offer for sale or transportation, or receive for transportation any meat or poultry products that are not intended for human food unless they are denatured or otherwise identified as required by the rules of the department or are naturally inedible by humans.

(3)  A person engaged in the business of buying, selling, or transporting dead, dying, disabled, or diseased animals, or any parts of the carcasses of any animals that died otherwise than by slaughter, may not buy, sell, transport, offer for sale or transportation, or receive for transportation the animals or parts of carcasses unless the transaction or transportation is made in accordance with rules adopted by the department to assure that the animals or parts of carcasses will be prevented from being used for human food.



Amended by Chapter 242, 2010 General Session

